Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-314
Nebraska Arts Council; federal funds; receive; disburse.

The council shall be the official agency of this state to receive and disburse any funds made available by the federal government for programs related to the performing and fine arts.

Laws 1973, LB 121, § 6.